Hawaii statutes.
[§432:2-406] Mammogram coverage required;
referral not required. (a) A fraternal benefit society shall provide
coverage for an annual screening mammogram to the same extent as required under
section 431:10A-116; provided that no fraternal benefit society shall require a
covered person forty years of age and older to obtain a referral from a primary
care provider or other physician for an annual screening mammogram.

(b) If the screening mammogram indicates that
follow up services are advisable, a referral shall be made to the patient's
primary care physician or other physician, as designated by the patient. [L
2012, c 92, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next